Utah statutes.
26-21-22.   Reporting of disciplinary information -- Immunity from
liability.
A health care facility licensed under this chapter which reports disciplinary
information on a licensed nurse to the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing within the Department of Commerce as required by
Section 58-31b-702 is entitled to the immunity from liability provided by that
section.
